apertium-hun.hun.dix
    <!-- béke : béket : békék :békéje-->
    <pardef n="bék/e__n">
        <e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ét</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ének</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ével</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ében</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>én</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>énél</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ébe</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ére</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="sub"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>éhez</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>éből</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ela"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>éről</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dela"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>étől</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>ék</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>éket</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>éknek</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ékkel</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ékben</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>éken</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>éknél</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ékbe</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ékre</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="sub"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ékhez</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ékből</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ela"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ékről</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dela"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>éktől</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>ém</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>éd</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="px2sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>éje</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="px3sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>énk</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>étek</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="px2pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>éjük</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="px3pl"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>énkben</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>énkre</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="sub"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="any/a__n">
        <e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>át</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ának</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ával</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ában</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ához</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ába</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ánál</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>án</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>ja</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="px3sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>jának</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="px3sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>jára</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="sub"/><s n="px3sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>juk</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="px3pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- ny nny -->
    <pardef n="lá/ny__n">
        <e><p><l>ny</l><r>ny<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nynak</l><r>ny<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nyt</l><r>ny<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nnyal</l><r>ny<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nyban</l><r>ny<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nyhoz</l><r>ny<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nyba</l><r>ny<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nynál</l><r>ny<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nyon</l><r>ny<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>nya</l><r>ny<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="px3sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nyának</l><r>ny<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="px3sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nyára</l><r>ny<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="sub"/><s n="px3sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nyuk</l><r>ny<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="px3pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- pohár : poharat : poharak : poharral : pohara-->
    <pardef n="poh/ár__n">
        <e><p><l>ár</l><r>ár<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>árnak</l><r>ár<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>arat</l><r>ár<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>árral</l><r>ár<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>árban</l><r>ár<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>árhoz</l><r>ár<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>árba</l><r>ár<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>árnál</l><r>ár<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>áron</l><r>ár<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>arak</l><r>ár<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>ara</l><r>ár<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="px3sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>arának</l><r>ár<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="px3sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>arára</l><r>ár<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="sub"/><s n="px3sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>aruk</l><r>ár<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="px3pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- shortening -->
    <pardef n="/út__n">
        <e><p><l>út</l><r>út<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>útnak</l><r>út<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>utat</l><r>út<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>úttal</l><r>út<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>útban</l><r>út<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>úthoz</l><r>út<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>útba</l><r>út<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>útnál</l><r>út<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>úton</l><r>út<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>utak</l><r>út<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>útja</l><r>út<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="px3sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>útjának</l><r>út<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="px3sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>útjára</l><r>út<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="sub"/><s n="px3sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>útjuk</l><r>út<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="px3pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="alany"><i>ala</i><par n="lá/ny__n"/></e>
    <e lm="anya"><i>any</i><par n="any/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="apa"><i>ap</i><par n="any/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="arány"><i>ará</i><par n="lá/ny__n"/></e>
    <e lm="árbockosár"><i>árbockos</i><par n="poh/ár__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ásvány"><i>ásvá</i><par n="lá/ny__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bálvány"><i>bálvá</i><par n="lá/ny__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bárány"><i>bárá</i><par n="lá/ny__n"/></e>
    <e lm="benge"><i>beng</i><par n="bék/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bibeszár"><i>bibesz</i><par n="poh/ár__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bizonyítvány"><i>bizonyítvá</i><par n="lá/ny__n"/></e>
    <e lm="blockflöte"><i>blockflöt</i><par n="bék/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="búcsúpohár"><i>búcsúpoh</i><par n="poh/ár__n"/></e>
    <e lm="búzaár"><i>búza</i><par n="poh/ár__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cefre"><i>cefr</i><par n="bék/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cickány"><i>cická</i><par n="lá/ny__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cigány"><i>cigá</i><par n="lá/ny__n"/></e>
    <e lm="címtár"><i>címt</i><par n="poh/ár__n"/></e>
    <e lm="csabaíre"><i>csabaír</i><par n="bék/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="csákány"><i>csáká</i><par n="lá/ny__n"/></e>
    <e lm="csalogány"><i>csalogá</i><par n="lá/ny__n"/></e>
    <e lm="csapatkapitány"><i>csapatkapitá</i><par n="lá/ny__n"/></e>
    <e lm="csatolmány"><i>csatolmá</i><par n="lá/ny__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cseresznye"><i>csereszny</i><par n="bék/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="csicsörke"><i>csicsörk</i><par n="bék/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="csizmaszár"><i>csizmasz</i><par n="poh/ár__n"/></e>
    <e lm="csótány"><i>csótá</i><par n="lá/ny__n"/></e>
    <e lm="csörge"><i>csörg</i><par n="bék/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dinnye"><i>dinny</i><par n="bék/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="eke"><i>ek</i><par n="bék/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="éléstár"><i>élést</i><par n="poh/ár__n"/></e>
    <e lm="eperhere"><i>eperher</i><par n="bék/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="etyele-petyele"><i>etyele-petyel</i><par n="bék/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fáskosár"><i>fáskos</i><par n="poh/ár__n"/></e>
    <e lm="felár"><i>fel</i><par n="poh/ár__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fémlemezke"><i>fémlemezk</i><par n="bék/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fénysugár"><i>fénysug</i><par n="poh/ár__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fülemüle"><i>fülemül</i><par n="bék/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gerle"><i>gerl</i><par n="bék/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gyorstár"><i>gyorst</i><par n="poh/ár__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hajógyár"><i>hajógy</i><par n="poh/ár__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hajperje"><i>hajperj</i><par n="bék/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hátikosár"><i>hátikos</i><par n="poh/ár__n"/></e>
    <e lm="irányár"><i>irány</i><par n="poh/ár__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jégmadár"><i>jégmad</i><par n="poh/ár__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jézusszíve"><i>jézusszív</i><par n="bék/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kantárszár"><i>kantársz</i><par n="poh/ár__n"/></e>
    <e lm="keltike"><i>keltik</i><par n="bék/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kenyérár"><i>kenyér</i><par n="poh/ár__n"/></e>
    <e lm="készpénzár"><i>készpénz</i><par n="poh/ár__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kéziszótár"><i>kéziszót</i><par n="poh/ár__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kislány"><i>kislá</i><par n="lá/ny__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kismegye"><i>kismegy</i><par n="bék/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kispohár"><i>kispoh</i><par n="poh/ár__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kőolajár"><i>kőolaj</i><par n="poh/ár__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kút"><i>k</i><par n="/út__n"/></e>
    <e lm="közraktár"><i>közrakt</i><par n="poh/ár__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lány"><i>lá</i><par n="lá/ny__n"/></e>
    <e lm="leltár"><i>lelt</i><par n="poh/ár__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lenszőke"><i>lenszők</i><par n="bék/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lőporgyár"><i>lőporgy</i><par n="poh/ár__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mangrove"><i>mangrov</i><par n="bék/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mentsvár"><i>mentsv</i><par n="poh/ár__n"/></e>
    <e lm="meskete"><i>mesket</i><par n="bék/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nemere"><i>nemer</i><par n="bék/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ólomzár"><i>ólomz</i><par n="poh/ár__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pele"><i>pel</i><par n="bék/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pite"><i>pit</i><par n="bék/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="raktár"><i>rakt</i><par n="poh/ár__n"/></e>
    <e lm="részecske"><i>részecsk</i><par n="bék/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sütöde"><i>sütöd</i><par n="bék/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="szelepzár"><i>szelepz</i><par n="poh/ár__n"/></e>
    <e lm="szike"><i>szik</i><par n="bék/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="terefere"><i>terefer</i><par n="bék/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="torkolatzár"><i>torkolatz</i><par n="poh/ár__n"/></e>
    <e lm="törpe"><i>törp</i><par n="bék/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="út"><i/><par n="/út__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vételár"><i>vétel</i><par n="poh/ár__n"/></e>
    <e lm="üdvöske"><i>üdvösk</i><par n="bék/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="üvegpohár"><i>üvegpoh</i><par n="poh/ár__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zönge"><i>zöng</i><par n="bék/e__n"/></e>
